Montana, session 2025, HB346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Exemption from environmental review. The department is exempt from the provisions
of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing loans, administering a loan program, or creating a loan
program related to microbusiness development pursuant to this part.
Section 2. Exemption from environmental review. The department of commerce is exempt from
the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing grants, administering a grant program, or
creating a grant program related to historic preservation pursuant to this part.
Section 3. Exemption from environmental review. The department is exempt from the provisions
of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing grants, administering a grant program, or creating a grant
program related to workforce training pursuant to this part.
Section 4. Exemption from environmental review. The department of commerce, the state-tribal
economic development commission, and heritage preservation and cultural tourism commissions created as
provided in 90-1-162 are exempt from the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing
grants or loans, administering a grant or loan program, or creating a grant or loan program related to
agritourism, heritage and cultural tourism, business investments in historic downtown and commercial areas,
Montana-based films, regional development corporations, sites and programs associated with the Lewis and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 346
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 346
Clark expedition, small businesses, or tourism pursuant to this part.
Section 5. Exemption from environmental review. The department is exempt from the provisions
of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing grants or loans, administering a grant or loan program, or
creating a grant or loan program related to economic development projects pursuant to this part.
Section 6. Exemption from environmental review. The department of commerce is exempt from
the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing loans, administering a loan program, or
creating a loan program related to the Montana wood products industry pursuant to this part.
Section 7. Exemption from environmental review. The department and the board of housing are
exempt from the provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing loans, administering a loan
program, or creating a loan program related to the financing of housing pursuant to this part.
Section 8. Exemption from environmental review. The board of housing is exempt from the
provisions of Title 75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing loans, administering a loan program, or
creating a loan program related to reverse annuity mortgage loans to elderly citizens.
Section 9. Exemption from environmental review. The board is exempt from the provisions of Title
75, chapter 1, parts 1 and 2, when authorizing loans, administering a loan program, or creating a loan program
related to the veterans' home loan mortgage program.
Section 10. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a copy of [this
act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.
Section 11. Codification instruction. (1) [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of
Title 17, chapter 6, part 4, and the provisions of Title 17, chapter 6, part 4, apply to [section 1].
(2) [Section 2] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 22, chapter 3, part 13, and the
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 346
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 346
provisions of Title 22, chapter 3, part 13, apply to [section 2].
(3) [Section 3] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 39, chapter 11, part 2, and the
provisions of Title 39, chapter 11, part 2, apply to [section 3].
(4) [Section 4] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 90, chapter 1, part 1, and the
provisions of Title 90, chapter 1, part 1, apply to [section 4].
(5) [Section 5] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 90, chapter 1, part 2, and the
provisions of Title 90, chapter 1, part 2, apply to [section 5].
(6) [Section 6] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 90, chapter 1, part 5, and the
provisions of Title 90, chapter 1, part 5, apply to [section 6].
(7) [Section 7] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 90, chapter 6, part 1, and the
provisions of Title 90, chapter 6, part 1, apply to [section 7].
(8) [Section 8] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 90, chapter 6, part 5, and the
provisions of Title 90, chapter 6, part 5, apply to [section 8].
(9) [Section 9] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title 90, chapter 6, part 6, and the
provisions of Title 90, chapter 6, part 6, apply to [section 9].
Section 12. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 346
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 346, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 346
INTRODUCED BY P. TUSS, E. ALBUS, S. GIST, S. FITZPATRICK, J. FITZPATRICK
AN ACT EXEMPTING DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE GRANT AND LOAN PROGRAMS FROM REVIEW
UNDER THE MONTANA ENVIRONMENTAL POLICY ACT; PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AND
PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”